District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1601

Findings.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-143, § 2, 25 DCR 6114
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-234, § 3, 42 DCR 28

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1901.
1973 Ed., § 31-2101.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 10-224, § 3 ( 41 DCR 8055), eff. March 16, 1995, provided for the temporary repeal of this chapter. Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 10-224 provided for expiration “on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Budget Spending Reduction Amendment Act of 1994, whichever occurs first.”

D.C. Law 10-253, title XII, § 1202 ( 42 DCR 721), eff. March 23, 1995, provided for the temporary repeal of this chapter. Title XIII, § 1301(b) of D.C. Law 10-253 provided for expiration “on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Act of 1995, whichever occurs first.”